New York, session 2025-2026, S9904.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 577 of the 2 labor law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 10 to read as follows: 3 (10) moneys credited to this state pursuant to section nine hundred 4 one of the federal social security act. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15058-01-6